District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-311

Priority subject to subordination.

Nothing in this article prevents subordination by agreement by any person entitled to priority.

History

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-311.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 9-316.

Purposes: The several preceding sections deal with questions of priority. This section is inserted to make it entirely clear that a person entitled to priority may effectively agree to subordinate the claim. Only the person entitled to priority may make such an agreement: the rights of such a person cannot be adversely affected by an agreement to which that person is not a party.

Cross References:Sections 1-102 and 2A-304 through 2A-310.

Definitional Cross References: “Agreement”. Section 1-201(3).

“Person”. Section 1-201(30).